California statutes. Public Resources Code
 organization, foundation, small business, joint powers authority, tribal government, or other organization with a history of providing community-based outreach and technical assistance.

(i) The council shall provide advance payments of grant awards, over a period of not more than three years, to recipients to initiate and implement the collaboratives in a timely manner. In consultation with the Department of Finance, the council shall adopt guidelines imposing additional requirements relating to the provision of advance payments and the use of the advance payments by the grant recipient to ensure that the moneys are used properly.

(j) (1) Collaboratives shall submit to the council an annual report that includes, but need not be limited to, all of the
 following:

(A) The members of the collaborative.

(B) Populations served.

(C) An outline of all the activities conducted, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Technical assistance.

(ii) Capacity building.

(iii) Project and grant development, application, and completion.

(D) Meetings and actions taken by the collaborative.

(E) An accounting of the administration of and expenditures made by the collaborative.

(F) The
 outcome of each activity, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The efficacy of capacity building within the region.

(ii) Technical assistance provided.

(iii) Success of grants applied for.

(iv) Projects commenced and completed.

(2) (A) The council shall post the annual reports on its Internet Web site and provide the reports to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(k) (1) By October 1, 2019, the council shall adopt guidelines implementing this section.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to this section.

(l) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 377, Sec. 2.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section inoperative October 1, 2029.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

71132.

(a) By July 1, 2020, the council shall develop technical assistance guidelines that a state agency may use in delivering its technical assistance resources or in developing additional internal technical assistance policies, standards, or guidelines specific to the agency’s programs. The technical assistance guidelines may support established technical assistance programs and build upon best practices. The council’s technical assistance guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Procedures and standards for state agencies providing direct technical assistance to under-resourced communities.

(2) Measures to provide efficient technical assistance
 across multiple programs, where applicable.

(b) The council shall consult with relevant state entities during the development of the technical assistance guidelines required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The technical assistance guidelines required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall identify grants that would benefit from technical assistance policies, standards, or guidelines.

(d) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 377, Sec. 2.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.7. Climate Change and Climate Adaptation [71150. - 71160.]

71150.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council.

(c) “Office” means the Office of Planning and Research.

(d) “Plan” means the Safeguarding California Plan.

(e) “Vulnerable communities” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 71340.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 338, Sec. 3.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71152.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to prioritize the most vulnerable communities, ecosystems, and economic sectors in the state’s climate adaptation and resilience strategy set forth in the Safeguarding California Plan by ensuring that all state departments and agencies accurately identify, collaboratively prepare for, and are sufficiently resourced to adequately respond to the impacts of climate change, such as extreme weather events, the urban heat island effect, habitat loss, wildfire, sea level rise, and drought.

(b) It also is the intent of the Legislature that the agency consider developing policies to address the impacts of climate change and climate adaptation with a focus on equity and that actions taken to address climate adaptation should be consistent with the plan. In developing these policies and taking these actions, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The creation of planning processes that are transparent, fair, and inclusive in the development phases.

(2) The prioritization of
 resources and investments for vulnerable communities and populations.

(3) The adoption of strategies that seek to address and, at a minimum, avoid worsening social and racial inequities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 338, Sec. 4.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71153.

(a) By July 1, 2024, and every three years thereafter, the agency shall update the state’s climate adaptation strategy, known as the plan. As part of the update, the agency shall coordinate with the office and other state agencies to identify a lead agency or group of agencies to lead adaptation efforts in each sector. The updates to the plan shall include all of the following:

(1) Vulnerabilities to climate change by sector, as identified by the lead agency or group of agencies, and regions, including, at a minimum,
 the following sectors:

(A) Water.

(B) Energy.

(C) Transportation.

(D) Public health.

(E) Agriculture.

(F) Emergency services.

(G) Forestry.

(H) Biodiversity and habitat.

(I) Ocean and coastal resources.

(J) Financial
 resources.

(2) Vulnerabilities to climate change for vulnerable communities, as identified by the office, through the Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resilience Program.

(3) An operational definition of “climate resilience” for each sector and for vulnerable communities, as identified by the lead agency or group of agencies, so that total costs, funding plans, and other strategies to adequately prepare for disruptions, recover from shocks and stresses, and adapt and grow from various disruptions, especially in the most vulnerable communities, are analyzed and reported.

(4) Priority actions needed to reduce
 risks and achieve climate resilience in those sectors and vulnerable communities,
 as identified by the lead agency or group of agencies, with an emphasis on maximizing risk mitigation for the greatest number of people living in vulnerable communities.

(5) Special protections of vulnerable communities and industries that are disproportionately impacted by climate change.

(6) Opportunities to improve policy and budget coordination across jurisdictions, including federal and local jurisdictions.

(7) Timetables for
 near-term, medium-term, and long-term timescales, and specific metrics to measure and evaluate the state’s progress in implementing the plan, as identified by the agency or the office. Metrics to evaluate progress toward meeting the goals may be modeled for the years 2030, 2050, 2080, 2100, and beyond.

(b) (1) By January 1,
 2024, and every three years thereafter, the agency shall release a draft plan. Between the release of the draft plan and the publication of the final update of the plan, the agency shall hold at least three public hearings for the purpose of providing an opportunity for the public to review and provide written and oral comments on the draft plan. The public hearings shall be held in northern California, the central valley of California, and southern California.

(2) In preparing the draft plan, the agency shall engage with local and regional entities, including local agencies and communities, to enhance policy and funding coordination and promote regional solutions and implementation.

(c) In identifying
 the vulnerabilities pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), each lead agency or group of agencies shall, at a minimum, be informed by the most recent California Climate Change Assessment, the climate science research programs administered by the council and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, the Climate Change and Health Vulnerability Indicators for California as produced by the Climate Change and Health Equity Section of the State Department of Public Health, and other peer-reviewed climate science research relevant to California.

(d) The agency shall annually report to the
 Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on actions taken by each applicable agency to implement the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 338, Sec. 5.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71154.

To address the vulnerabilities identified in the plan, state agencies shall work to maximize, where applicable and feasible, all of the following objectives:

(a) Educating the public about the consequences of climate change, such as sea level rise, extreme weather events, the urban heat island effect, habitat loss, wildfire, drought, threats to infrastructure and agriculture, worsening air and water quality, and public health impacts.

(b) Ensuring there is a continued repository for scientific data on climate change and climate adaptation in the state in order to facilitate educated state and local policy decisions and to help identify primary risks from climate change to residents, property, communities, and natural
 systems across the state.

(c) (1) Promoting the use of the plan to inform planning decisions and ensure that state investments consider climate change impacts, as well as promote the use of natural systems and natural infrastructure, when developing physical infrastructure to address adaptation.

(2) When developing infrastructure to address adaptation, where feasible, a project alternative should be developed that uses existing natural features and ecosystem processes or the restoration of natural features and ecosystem processes to meet the project’s goals.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “natural infrastructure” means using natural ecological systems or processes to reduce vulnerability to climate change related hazards, or other related climate change effects, while increasing the
 long-term adaptive capacity of coastal and inland areas by perpetuating or restoring ecosystem services. This includes, but is not limited to, the conservation, preservation, or sustainable management of any form of aquatic or terrestrial vegetated open space, such as beaches, dunes, tidal marshes, reefs, seagrass, aquifers, parks, rain gardens, and urban tree canopies. It also includes systems and practices that use or mimic natural processes, such as permeable pavements, bioswales, and other engineered systems, such as levees that are combined with restored natural systems, to provide clean water, conserve ecosystem values and functions, and provide a wide array of benefits to people and wildlife.

(d) Encouraging regional collaborative planning efforts to address regional climate change impacts and adaptation strategies.

(e) Promoting drought resiliency through an integrated
 water supply, delivery, and capture system that is coordinated and that can be resilient to a multiyear drought scenario while protecting water quality and public health. Establishing both drought preparation programs, which will help create sustainable water systems in the future, and immediate drought response programs, which will reduce water demand or increase supply within one to five years of any declared drought.

(f) Building resilient communities by developing urban greening projects that reduce air pollution and heat reflection in urban areas and create livable, sustainable communities in urban cores to promote infill development and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(g) Protecting and enhancing habitat, species strongholds, and wildlife corridors that are critical to the preservation of species that are at risk from the consequences of climate change.

(h) Promoting actions to ensure healthy soils and sustainable agriculture; inform reliable transportation planning; improve emergency management response across sectors; ensure sufficient, reliable, and safe energy; improve capacity to reduce and respond to public health threats; address the impacts of climate change on disadvantaged communities; and protect cultural resources from the impacts of climate change.

(i) Prioritizing equity by ensuring public expenditures that address climate change adaptation prioritize protecting vulnerable communities, rectifying intersectional and systemic inequities, and enhancing low-income and vulnerable communities’ abilities to weather the impacts of climate change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 23.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71155.

(a) Consistent with this part, state agencies shall take into account the current and future impacts of climate change, including the economic damages and financial liabilities associated with those impacts, when planning, designing, building, operating, maintaining, and investing in state infrastructure.

(b) (1) The Climate-Safe Infrastructure Working Group is established under the agency for the purpose of examining how to integrate scientific data concerning projected climate change impacts into state infrastructure engineering, including oversight, investment, design, and construction.

(2) The working group shall consist of the following:

(A) Professional engineers registered in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code with relevant expertise in state infrastructure design from the Department of Transportation, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of General Services, and other relevant state agencies, as applicable.

(B) Scientists from the University of California, the California State University, and other institutions who have expertise in climate change projections and impacts across California.

(C) Licensed architects with relevant experience in state infrastructure design, as applicable.

(3) The two groups specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) shall be equitably represented in the
 membership of the working group, to the extent reasonable and appropriate.

(4) The working group shall work in coordination with other state climate adaptation planning efforts and shall consider and build upon existing information produced by the state, including information from the most recent California Climate Change Assessment conducted pursuant to Executive Order S-3-05, the plan, the five-year infrastructure plan developed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the State of California Sea-Level Rise Guidance Document completed pursuant to Executive Order S-13-08, among other resources.

(5) The working group shall work in coordination with other state agencies that advance sustainability in infrastructure, including the council and the Government Operations Agency.

(c) The working group shall consider and investigate, at a minimum, the following issues:

(1) The current informational and institutional barriers to integrating projected climate change impacts into state infrastructure design.

(2) The critical information that engineers responsible for infrastructure design and construction need to address climate change impacts.

(3) How to select an appropriate engineering design for a range of future climate scenarios as related to infrastructure planning and investment.

(d) The working group shall only convene and perform its functions to the extent resources are available to fund the support of the working group and its
 activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   (AB 2800)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

71155.5.

The Treasurer, and the financing authorities that the Treasurer chairs, may assist state agencies by leveraging public and private capital investment to help with loans and other incentives to attain the goals established pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 338, Sec. 7.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71160.

(a) The agency shall explore and may implement options within the agency’s jurisdiction to establish a more coordinated and efficient regulatory review and permitting process for coastal adaptation projects that use natural infrastructure.

(b) (1) By July 1, 2023, the agency shall report to the Legislature on suggestions and recommendations for improving and expediting the
 coordination between appropriate agencies in their regulatory review and permitting process for coastal adaptation projects that use natural infrastructure.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) The report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “coastal adaptation projects that use natural infrastructure” means development, as defined in Section 30106, that relies on natural ecological systems or processes to reduce vulnerability to climate change related hazards, or other related climate change effects, while increasing the long-term adaptive capacity of coastal and inland areas by perpetuating or restoring ecosystem services. This includes, but is not limited to, the
 conservation, preservation, or sustainable management of any form of aquatic or terrestrial vegetated open space, such as beaches, dunes, tidal marshes, reefs, seagrass, parks, rain gardens, and urban tree canopies. It also includes systems and practices that use or mimic natural processes, such as permeable pavements, bioswales, and other engineered systems, such as levees that are combined with restored natural systems, to provide clean water, conserve ecosystem values and functions, and provide a wide array of benefits to people and wildlife.

(2) Coastal adaptation projects that use natural infrastructure may also include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Soft strategies that avoid fixing the shoreline with hard structures and instead rely on the use of
 dynamic systems to attenuate coastal hazards, such as dune or wetland restoration.

(B) Hybrid armoring that combines fixing the shoreline to some limited extent, such as with a buried revetment or other shoreline protective device, with a nature-based feature to provide ecological benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 369, Sec. 2.   (AB 72)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.8. REFINERY SAFETY [71275. - 71275.]

71275.

(a) The California Environmental Protection Agency, in consultation with the following agencies, shall examine ways to improve public and
 worker safety through enhanced oversight of refineries and to strengthen emergency preparedness in anticipation of any future refinery incident, and shall facilitate coordination among these agencies to protect the public, fence line communities, and refinery workers from risks associated with refinery operations throughout the state:

(1) The Governor’s Office of Emergency Services.

(2) The California Environmental Protection Agency.

(3) The State Air Resources Board.

(4) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(5) The State Water Resources Control Board.

(6) The Department of Industrial Relations.

(7) The Division of Occupational Safety and Health
 (Cal-OSHA).

(8) The State Department of Public Health.

(9) The Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(10) The Office of the State Fire Marshal.

(11) Certified unified program agencies in areas with refineries.

(12) Local air districts in areas with refineries.

(13) The United States Environmental Protection Agency, Region 9.

(b) Local agencies and the United States Environmental Protection Agency may elect to participate in the efforts provided for in this section at their option.

(c) (1) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall convene at least two public meetings annually to provide members of the public with current information on refinery safety and to receive information from the public regarding health and safety concerns associated with refinery operations.

(2) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall request representatives from each agency listed in subdivision (a) to attend the public meetings convened pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Meetings convened pursuant to this subdivision shall be held in geographically distinct
 locations in areas where a refinery is located.

(d) The provisions of this section shall be carried out by agency personnel within the scope of their existing duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   (AB 1649)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: Sections 71200 through 71271 are located in Division 36, which follows Section 71424.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. STATEWIDE ENVIRONMENTAL EDUCATION [71300. - 71305.]

71300.

(a) For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(2) “Office” means the Office of Education and the Environment of the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, as established pursuant to this section.

(3) “Program” means the statewide environmental education program prescribed in this part.

(b) The Office of Education and the Environment previously established in the California Environmental Protection Agency is hereby established
 in the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery. The office shall dedicate its effort to implementing the statewide environmental education program prescribed pursuant to this part, including the integrated waste educational requirements specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 71301. The office, through staffing and resources, shall give a high priority to implementing the statewide environmental education program.

(c) The office, under the direction of the department, in cooperation with the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, shall develop and implement a unified education strategy on the environment for elementary and secondary schools in the state. The office shall develop a unified education strategy to do all of the following:

(1) Coordinate instructional resources and strategies for providing active pupil participation with
 onsite conservation efforts.

(2) Promote service-learning opportunities between schools and local communities.

(3) Assess the impact to participating pupils of the unified education strategy on pupil achievement and resource conservation.

(d) The State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, in cooperation with the department, shall develop and implement to the extent feasible, a teacher training and implementation plan, to guide the implementation of the unified education strategy, for the education of pupils, faculty, and administrators on the importance of integrating environmental concepts and programs in schools throughout the state. The strategy shall project the phased implementation of elementary, middle, and high school programs.

(e) In implementing this part, the office may hold public meetings to receive and respond to comments from affected state agencies, stakeholders, and the public regarding the development of resources and materials pursuant to this part.

(f) In implementing this part, the office shall coordinate with other agencies and groups with expertise in education and the environment.

(g) Any instructional materials developed pursuant to this part shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 60000) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, including, but not limited to, reviews for legal and social compliance before the materials may be used in elementary or secondary public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 36.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71301.

(a) As part of the unified education strategy specified in subdivision (c) of Section 71300, the office, in cooperation with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Natural Resources Agency, the State Department of Education, and the State Board of Education, shall develop environmental principles and concepts for elementary and secondary school pupils.

(b) (1) The environmental principles and concepts may be updated every four years beginning July 1, 2008, by the office, in cooperation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the California Environmental Protection Agency, and the Natural Resources Agency, pursuant to the process set forth in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) When updating or amending the environmental principles and concepts, the office shall ensure that the environmental principles and concepts are based on current scientific and technical knowledge, and shall solicit and coordinate input from the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and other executive branch agencies and departments, nongovernmental science and education consultants and organizations with the relevant scientific and technical knowledge, and currently employed, credentialed, public school classroom teachers with experience in education related to the environment. A majority of the individuals consulted to review proposed updates or amendments to the environmental principles and concepts shall be credentialed, current public school elementary or secondary classroom teachers with experience in education related to the environment.

(3) When updating the environmental principles and concepts, the office shall hold a minimum of two public meetings in order for the public to provide input on the modifications. The public meetings required by this subdivision shall be held pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

 (c) The environmental principles and concepts shall be aligned to the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education in the subjects of English language arts, science, history-social science, health, and, to the extent practicable, mathematics, and shall not conflict with any academic content standards. The environmental principles and concepts shall be used to do all of the following:

(1) To direct state agencies that include environmental education
 components for elementary and secondary education in regulatory decisions or enforcement actions.

(2) To align state agency environmental education programs and materials that are developed for elementary and secondary education.

(3) For provision, by the office, of technical assistance to state agencies involved in the integration of the environmental principles and concepts in programs they operate, and in the integration of the environmental principles and concepts into state curriculum standards, frameworks, and instructional materials pursuant to Section 51227.3 of the Education Code.

(d) The environmental principles and concepts shall include, but not be limited to, concepts relating to the following topics:

(1) Air.

(2) Climate change.

(3) Energy.

(4) Environmental justice.

(5) Environmental sustainability.

(6) Fish and wildlife resources.

(7) Forestry.

(8) Integrated pest management.

(9) Oceans.

(10) Pollution prevention.

(11) Public health and the environment.

(12) Resource conservation, waste reduction, and
 recycling.

(13) Toxics and hazardous waste.

(14) Water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 374, Sec. 5.   (SB 720)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

71302.

(a) Using the education principles for the environment required to be developed pursuant to Section 71301, the office, in cooperation with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Natural Resources Agency, the State Department of Education, and the State Board of Education, shall develop a model environmental curriculum that incorporates these education principles for the environment. The model curriculum shall be aligned with applicable State Board of Education adopted academic content standards in science, mathematics, English/language arts, and history/social sciences, to the extent that any of those content areas are addressed in the model curriculum.

(b) The model curriculum shall be submitted to the
 Instructional Quality Commission for review. The commission shall submit its recommendation to the Secretary for Environmental Protection and to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(1) The Secretary for Environmental Protection and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall review and comment on the model curriculum.

(2) The model curriculum along with the comments by the Secretary for Environmental Protection and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall be submitted to the State Board of Education for its approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 38.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71303.

(a) As determined appropriate by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Department of Education shall incorporate into publications that provide examples of curriculum resources for teacher use, those materials developed by the office that provide information on the education principles for the environment developed pursuant to Section 71300.

(b) If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that materials developed by the office that provide information on the education principles for the environment are not appropriate for inclusion in publications that provide examples of curriculum resources for teacher use, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall collaborate with the office to make the
 changes necessary to ensure that the materials are included in that information.

(c) Pursuant to Section 71302, the department shall coordinate with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Department of Education, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency to facilitate use of the model environmental curriculum by elementary and secondary schools to the extent that funds are available for this purpose.

(d) The department, the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Department of Education, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency may collaborate with other federal, state, and local entities, and nongovernmental entities including nonprofit organizations, associations, businesses, individuals, and private entities, and may enter into interagency agreements,
 memoranda of understanding, and contracts to ensure implementation of this part.

(e) The department shall make the model curriculum available electronically on the department’s Internet Web site. The State Department of Education shall make readily identifiable on its Internet Web site a link to the department’s Internet Web site containing the curriculum.

(f) The State Department of Education, to the extent feasible and to the extent that funds are available for this purpose, shall encourage the development and use of instructional materials and active pupil participation in campus and community environmental education programs. To the extent feasible, the environmental education programs should be considered in the development and promotion of after school programs for elementary and secondary school pupils and state and local professional development activities to provide
 teachers with content background and resources to assist in teaching about the environment.

(g) The State Department of Education shall explore implementation of this section from its baseline resources dedicated to this purpose and if funding is not available from that source, then funding may be provided to the department, pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature, under Section 71305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 39.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71304.

(a) The office, in coordination with the Secretary for Environmental Protection, shall be responsible for the statewide coordination of regulatory administrative decisions that require the development or encourage the promotion of environmental education for elementary and secondary school pupils.

(b) All California Environmental Protection Agency or Natural Resources Agency boards, departments, or offices that take regulatory actions or take enforcement actions requiring the development of, or encouraging the promotion of, environmental education for elementary and secondary school pupils shall, prior to adoption or approval of the action, seek comments on the action from the office in order to promote consistency with
 this part and cross-media coordination.

(c) The office shall coordinate with all state agencies to develop and distribute environmental education materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 40.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71305.

(a) The Environmental Education Account is hereby established within the State Treasury. Moneys in the account may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be expended by the department for the purposes of this part. The Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall administer this part, including, but not limited to, the account.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department may accept and receive federal, state, and local funds and contributions of funds from a public or private organization or individual. The account may also receive proceeds from a judgment, settlement, fine, penalty, or other mechanism, in state or federal court, when the funds are contributed or the judgment specifies that the
 proceeds are to be used for the purposes of this part. The account may receive those funds, contributions, or proceeds from judgments, that are specifically designated for use for environmental education purposes. Private contributors shall not have the authority to further influence or direct the use of their contributions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency that requires the development of, or encourages the promotion of, environmental education for elementary and secondary school pupils, may contribute to the account.

(d) The department shall immediately deposit any funds contributed pursuant to subdivision (b) into the account.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the maintenance of the account is of the utmost importance to the state and that it is essential that any moneys in the account
 be used solely for the purposes authorized in this section and not be used, loaned, or transferred for any other purposes. Further, state agencies that promote environmental education for elementary and secondary school pupils will benefit from the environmental curriculum adopted pursuant to this part and should provide equitable and balanced support for the program.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 41.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.4. California Climate Change Assessment [71340. - 71343.]

71340.

(a) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, through the Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program established pursuant to Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 71350), shall develop the California Climate Change Assessment, in coordination with the Natural Resources Agency, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, and the Strategic Growth Council, and in consultation with partner public agencies designated by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may also contract with outside entities, including public universities, research institutions, organizations that serve vulnerable communities, and other technical experts to produce the assessment.

(b) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall complete the assessment no less frequently than every five years, and may release components of the assessment on a rolling basis as they become available.

(c) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall consider research from independent, scientifically peer-reviewed panels, financial reports, and other relevant and reasonably accessible data.

(d) For purposes of this part, “vulnerable communities” has the same meaning as the definition of “vulnerable communities” adopted by the Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program Technical Advisory Council in the most up-to-date “Defining Vulnerable Communities in the Context of Climate Adaptation” resource guide published by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 40.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

71341.

The California Climate Change Assessment shall provide an integrated suite of products that report the impacts and risks of climate change, based on the best available science, and identify potential solutions to inform legislative policy. These products shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Downscaled climate projections that assess climate change impacts throughout the state, including at regional and local levels, for near-term, medium-term, and long-term timescales, and under varied
 emissions scenarios, as appropriate and supported by the availability of the data, as determined by the Office of Planning and Research.

(b) A set of research reports that examine, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) How climate change will affect built systems, natural systems, and social systems, including the welfare of vulnerable communities, and the potential
 fiscal and economic impacts of these effects in California.

(2) Identification of potential climate adaptation and mitigation responses, including their costs and benefits.

(c) Regionally specific reports that can inform regional and local vulnerability
 assessments, adaptation planning, and community resilience efforts.

(d) Reports on issues of statewide significance, including, but not limited to, environmental justice considerations, impacts on the systems identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and the unique risks posed to, and research and monitoring approaches used by, tribal communities.
